Utah statutes.
58-47b-304.   Exemptions from licensure.

(1)  In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307, the following individuals may engage in the practice of massage therapy as defined under this chapter, subject to the stated circumstances and limitations, without being licensed, but may not represent themselves as a massage therapist or massage apprentice:

(a)  physicians and surgeons licensed under Title 58, Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act;

(b)  nurses licensed under Title 58, Chapter 31b, Nurse Practice Act, or under Title 58, Chapter 44a, Nurse Midwife Practice Act;

(c)  physical therapists licensed under Title 58, Chapter 24b, Physical Therapy Practice Act;

(d)  physical therapist assistants licensed under Title 58, Chapter 24b, Physical Therapy Practice Act, while under the general supervision of a physical therapist;

(e)  osteopathic physicians and surgeons licensed under Title 58, Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act;

(f)  chiropractic physicians licensed under Title 58, Chapter 73, Chiropractic Physician Practice Act;

(g)  hospital staff members employed by a hospital who practice massage as part of their responsibilities;

(h)  athletic trainers who practice massage as part of their responsibilities while employed by an educational institution or an athletic team that participates in organized sports competition;

(i)  students in training enrolled in a massage therapy school approved by the division;

(j)  naturopathic physicians licensed under Title 58, Chapter 71, Naturopathic Physician Practice Act;

(k)  occupational therapist licensed under Title 58, Chapter 42a, Occupational Therapy Practice Act; and

(l)  persons performing gratuitous massage.

(2)  This chapter may not be construed to authorize any individual licensed under this chapter to engage in any manner in the practice of medicine as defined by the laws of this state.

(3)  This chapter may not be construed to:

(a)  create or require insurance coverage or reimbursement for massage therapy from third party payors if this type of coverage did not exist on or before February 15, 1990; or

(b)  prevent any insurance carrier from offering coverage for massage therapy.

